es: Diseño del motor: 2 tiempos; 4 tiempos; Otros
sl-SI: Zasnova motorja: 2-taktni; 4-taktni; Drugo
it: Design del motore: 2 tempi; 4 tempi; Altro
nl: Motorontwerp: 2-takt; 4-takt; Andere
bg-BG: Дизайн на двигателя: 2-тактов; 4-тактов; Други
zh-CN: 发动机设计: 2 冲程; 4 冲程; 其他
nb: Motordesign: 2-takts; 4-takts; Annet
ko: 엔진 디자인: 2행정; 4행정; 기타
pt-PT: Design de motor: 2 tempos; 4 tempos; Outro
cs: Konstrukce motoru: 2taktní; 4taktní; Jiné
ru: Конструкция двигателя: 2-тактный; 4-тактный; Другой
sk-SK: Dizajn motora: 2-taktný; 4-taktný; Iné
fr: Conception du moteur: 2 temps; 4 temps; Autre
vi: Thiết kế động cơ: 2 kỳ; 4 kỳ; Khác
pt-BR: Formato do motor: 2 tempos; 4 tempos; Outro
fi: Moottorin muotoilu: 2-tahtinen; 4-tahtinen; Muu
ja: エンジンの種類: 2ストローク; 4ストローク; その他
da: Motordesign: 2-takts; 4-takts; Andet
hu: A motor kialakítása: 2 ütemű; 4 ütemű; Egyéb
el: Σχεδιασμός κινητήρα: 2χρονη; 4χρονη; Άλλο
en: Engine design: 2-stroke; 4-stroke; Other
pl: Konstrukcja silnika: Dwusuwowy; Czterosuwowy; Inne
tr: Motor tasarımı: 2 zamanlı; 4 zamanlı; Diğer
ro-RO: Design motor: 2 timpi; 4 timpi; Altele
lt-LT: Variklio konstrukcija: Dvitaktis; Keturtaktis; Kita
de: Motordesign: Zweitakt; Viertakt; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Dizajn motora: Dvotaktni; Četverotaktni; Ostalo
zh-TW: 引擎設計: 2 行程; 4 行程; 其他
sv: Motorkonstruktion: 2-takt; 4-takt; Övrigt
th: การออกแบบเครื่องยนต์: 2 จังหวะ; 4 จังหวะ; อื่นๆ